Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.160

Medical examination of disability beneficiaries—Reentry.

(1) The board of administration may at its pleasure require any disability beneficiary under age sixty-two years to undergo medical examination to be made by a physician or surgeon appointed by the board, at a place to be designated by the board. Upon the basis of such examination the board shall determine whether such disability beneficiary is still totally and permanently incapacitated either mentally or physically for service in the office or department of the city where he or she was employed or in any other city service for which he or she is qualified. If the board of administration shall determine that said beneficiary is not so incapacitated, his or her retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall be reinstated forthwith in the city service.

(2) Should a disability beneficiary reenter the city service and be eligible for membership in the retirement system in accordance with RCW 41.28.030(1), his or her retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system, his or her rate of contribution for future years being that established for his or her age at the time of reentry. His or her individual account shall be credited with his or her accumulated contributions less the annuity payments made to him or her. An amount equal to the accumulated normal contributions so credited to him or her shall again be held for the benefit of said member and shall no longer be included in the amounts available to meet the obligations of the city on account of benefits that have been granted and on account of prior service of members. Such member shall receive credit for prior service in the same manner as if he or she had never been retired for disability.

(3) Should any disability beneficiary under age sixty-two years refuse to submit to medical examination, his or her pension may be discontinued until his or her withdrawal of such refusal, and should refusal continue for one year, his or her retirement allowance may be canceled. Should said disability beneficiary, prior to attaining age sixty-two years, engage in a gainful occupation not in city service, or should he or she reenter the city service and be ineligible for membership in the retirement system in accordance with RCW 41.28.030(2), the board of administration shall reduce the amount of his or her retirement allowance to an amount, which when added to the compensation earned by him or her in such occupation shall not exceed the amount of the final compensation on the basis of which his or her retirement allowance was determined. Should the earning capacity of such beneficiary be further altered, the board may further alter his or her retirement allowance to an amount which shall not exceed the amount upon which he or she was originally retired, but which, subject to such limitation shall equal, when added to the compensation earned by him or her, the amount of his or her final compensation on the basis of which his or her retirement allowance was determined. When said disability beneficiary reaches the age of sixty-two years, his or her retirement allowance shall be made equal to the amount upon which he or she was originally retired, and shall not again be modified for any cause except as provided in RCW 41.28.220.

(4) Should the retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into the city service he or she shall be paid his or her accumulated contributions, less annuity payments made to him or her.

[ 2012 c 117 s 53; 1939 c 207 s 17; RRS s 9592-117.]